Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.095

Distribution of estates to minors.

When a decree of distribution is made by the court in administration upon a decedent's estate or when distribution is made by a personal representative under a nonintervention will and distribution is ordered under such decree or authorized under such nonintervention will to a person under the age of eighteen years, it shall be required that:

(1) The money be deposited in a bank or trust company or be invested in an account in an insured financial institution for the benefit of the minor subject to withdrawal only upon the order of the court in the original probate proceeding, or upon said minor's attaining the age of eighteen years and furnishing proof thereof satisfactory to the depositary;

(2) A general guardian shall be appointed and qualify and the money or property be paid or delivered to such guardian prior to the discharge of the personal representative in the original probate proceeding; or

(3) A custodian be selected and the money or property be transferred to the custodian subject to chapter 11.114 RCW.

[ 1997 c 252 s 72; 1991 c 193 s 28; 1988 c 29 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 12; 1971 c 28 s 3; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.095.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective date—1991 c 193: See RCW 11.114.903.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.